Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 15.
TRANSPORTATION AND

UTILITIES

Chapter

261 Aeronautics

261C Hawaii Air Carriers--Repealed

261D Transportation Use Special Fund

261E Hawaii Air Carriers

262 Airport Zoning Act

263 Uniform Aeronautics Act (Modified)

263A Alcohol and Aviation Safety

264 Highways

265 County Highways, Sidewalks, Wharves--Repealed

265A County Highways and Sidewalks

266 Harbors

267 Boating Law--Repealed

267A Abandoned Vessels--Repealed

267B Trespass to Vessels--Repealed

267C Vessel Identification Numbers--Repealed

268 Ferries

269 Public Utilities Commission

269E One Call Center; Advance Warning to
Excavators

270 Employees of Public Utilities--Repealed

271 Motor Carrier Law

271G Hawaii Water Carrier Act

272 Defrauding Carriers of Passengers--Repealed

273 Railway Law

274 Radio Control--Repealed

275 Liabilities and Offenses Connected with
Telephones,

Wire Communications, and Cable Television
Systems

277 Energy Corridors

279 Transportation Control--Repealed

279A Statewide Transportation Planning

279D Metropolitan Planning Organizations

279E Metropolitan Planning Organization--Repealed

279G Ridesharing

CHAPTER
261

AERONAUTICS

General Provisions

Section

261-1 Definitions

261-2 Development of aeronautics, general

261-3 Legislation, intervention

261-4 Airports, general

261‑4.5 Biosecurity, inspection, and cargo
support facilities

261-5 Disposition of airport revenue fund

261-5.5 Passenger facility charge special fund

261-5.6 Rental motor vehicle customer facility
charge

special fund

261-6 Civil air patrol

261-7 Operation and use privileges

261-7.5 Airport facilities; collection of landing
fees and

other charges and fees

261-7.6 Use of credit cards to pay for airport
charges

261-8 Federal aid

261-9 Contracts, law governing

261-10 Exclusive rights prohibited

261-11 Public purpose of activities

261-12 Rules, standards

261-13 Orders, notice, and opportunity for hearings,

judicial review

261-13.5 Promotion of safety and efficient use of
facilities

where congestion occurs

261-13.6 Helicopter master plan; advisory committee

261-14 Federal-state joint hearings, reciprocal
services,

accident reporting

261-15 Federal airman and aircraft certificates

261-15.5 Aircraft registration

261-15.6 Annual registration fee

261-15.7 Failure to register

261-16 Licensing of airports

261-17 Enforcement of laws

261-17.5 Arrest or citation

261-17.6 Parking control at airports

261-17.7 Lost and found money or property at
airports

261-18 Hazard pay for employees

261-19 Exchange of violations information

261-20 Department proceedings and reports

261-21 Penalties

Airports

261-22 Hilo International Airport

261-23 Honolulu International Airport

261-24 John Rodgers Terminal

261-25 Repealed

261-26 Ellison Onizuka Kona International Airport

at Keahole

261-27 Kawaihapai Airfield

Airport Relocation

261-31 Definitions

261-32 Assistance for displaced person, families,

businesses and nonprofit organization

261-33 Replacement housing

261-34 Not treated as income

261-35 Decision of director

261-36 Rules and regulations

Special Facility Projects

261-51 Definitions

261-52 Powers

261-53 Findings and determination for special
facility

leases

261-54 Special facility lease

261-55 Special facility revenue bonds

Abandoned Aircraft

261-71 Custody and disposal of abandoned aircraft

261-72 Disposition of proceeds of sale

261-73 Custody and disposal of derelict aircraft

261-74 Aircraft or property taken into legal
custody;

unauthorized control

261-75 Disposal of aircraft by persons in
aircraft repair

business

Trespass to Aircraft

261-91 Trespass to aircraft; penalty

261-92 Questioning and detaining suspected
persons aboard

an aircraft

Cross References

Aircraft service and maintenance facility; general excise tax
exemption, see §237-24.9.

Case Notes

Provisions of chapter indicate that for purposes of antitrust
actions, department of transportation is, from every aspect, an instrumentality
of the State. 553 F. Supp. 976.

Does not represent clearly articulated state policy to
displace competition with state regulation in the provision of airport taxi
services. 562 F. Supp. 712.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next